Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.515

Amendment of foreign registration statement.

A registered foreign entity shall promptly deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment to its foreign registration statement if there is a change in:

(1) The name of the entity;

(2) The type of entity, including, if it is a foreign limited partnership, whether the entity became or ceased to be a foreign limited liability limited partnership;

(3) The entity's jurisdiction of formation;

(4) An address required by RCW 23.95.510(1)(d); or

(5) The information required by RCW 23.95.415(1).

[ 2015 c 176 s 1504.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.